Utah statutes.
23-15-8.   Seining or selling aquatic wildlife unlawful except as authorized.

It is unlawful for any person to seine for any kind of protected aquatic wildlife in any of the waters of this state or to sell protected aquatic wildlife except as prescribed by this title or rules of the Wildlife Board.



Amended by Chapter 153, 1994 General Session

